test/src/morphology/N-varzh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vaŗž*: # Noun 113 'eng /est vars/fin' - full paradigm
     vaŗž*+N+Sg+Nom: vaŗž*
     vaŗž*+N+Sg+Gen: vard
     vaŗž*+N+Sg+Par: vārta
     vaŗž*+N+Sg+Dat: vardõn
     vaŗž*+N+Sg+Ins: vardkõks
     vaŗž*+N+Sg+Ill: vardõ
     vaŗž*+N+Sg+Ela: vardstõ
     vaŗž*+N+Pl+Nom: vārdõd
     vaŗž*+N+Pl+Gen: vārdõd
     vaŗž*+N+Pl+Par: vaŗži
     vaŗž*+N+Pl+Dat: vārdõdõn
     vaŗž*+N+Pl+Ins: vārdõdõks
     vaŗž*+N+Pl+Ill: vaŗžiz
     vaŗž*+N+Pl+Ela: vaŗžist
